sample-output.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>
    अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ए ऐ ओ औ क ख ग घ च छ ज झ ट ठ ड ढ त थ द ध न प फ ब भ म य र ल व श ष स ह ् ा ि ी ु ू ृ े ै ो ौ ं ् ड़ ढ़ ॐ
  </alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="3"/>
    <sdef n="d"/>
    <sdef n="o"/>
    <sdef n="0"/>
  </sdefs>
  <section id="main">
    <pardef n="Noun_m">
      <e><p><l>ladZikA</l><r/></p><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="3"/><s n="d"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ladZikA</l><r>ए</r></p><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="3"/><s n="d"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ladZikA</l><r>आ</r></p><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="3"/><s n="o"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ladZikA</l><r>अन</r></p><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="3"/><s n="o"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Noun_f">
      <e><p><l>rāt</l><r/></p><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="3"/><s n="d"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
      <e><p><l>rāt</l><r>एं</r></p><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="3"/><s n="d"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
      <e><p><l>rāt</l><r/></p><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="3"/><s n="o"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
      <e><p><l>rāt</l><r>ओं</r></p><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="3"/><s n="o"/><s n="0"/><s n="0"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <e lm="ladZikA"><i>ladZikA</i><par n="Noun_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rāt"><i>rāt</i><par n="Noun_f"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
